Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-138
Certificate of approval; federal government; exception.

The provisions of sections 3-133 to 3-136 shall not apply to any airport, restricted landing area or other air navigation facility owned or operated by the federal government within this state.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 9(11), p. 95.